Washington statutes.
RCW 36.96.080

Dissolved special purpose district—Satisfaction of outstanding obligations.

If the proceeds from the sale of any property of the special district together with any moneys or funds of the special purpose district are insufficient to satisfy the outstanding obligations of the special purpose district, the county legislative authority, acting as a board of trustees, shall exercise any and all powers conferred upon it to satisfy such outstanding obligations: PROVIDED, That in no case shall the board of trustees be obligated to satisfy such outstanding obligations from county moneys, funds, or other sources of revenue unless it would have been so obligated before initiation of the dissolution proceedings under this chapter.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 5 s 8.]